src/fst/orthography/Latn-to-Cyrl.xfscript
! Script for Latin to Cyrillic for Erzya

! begins with upper-case

define BäComposeRule [ B ä ] -> [ Б я ] ;
define BaComposeRule [ B a ] -> [ Б а ] ;
define BiComposeRule [ B i ] -> [ Б и ] ;
define ByComposeRule [ B y ] -> [ Б ы ] ;
define BüComposeRule [ B ü ] -> [ Б ю ] ;
define BuComposeRule [ B u ] -> [ Б у ] ;
define BeComposeRule [ B e ] -> [ Б е ] ;
define BěComposeRule [ B ě ] -> [ Б э ] ;
define BöComposeRule [ B ö ] -> [ Б ё ] ;
define BoComposeRule [ B o ] -> [ Б о ] ;

define VäComposeRule [ V ä ] -> [ В я ] ;
define VaComposeRule [ V a ] -> [ В а ] ;
define ViComposeRule [ V i ] -> [ В и ] ;
define VyComposeRule [ V y ] -> [ В ы ] ;
define VüComposeRule [ V ü ] -> [ В ю ] ;
define VuComposeRule [ V u ] -> [ В у ] ;
define VeComposeRule [ V e ] -> [ В е ] ;
define VěComposeRule [ V ě ] -> [ В э ] ;
define VöComposeRule [ V ö ] -> [ В ё ] ;
define VoComposeRule [ V o ] -> [ В о ] ;

define GäComposeRule [ G ä ] -> [ Г я ] ;
define GaComposeRule [ G a ] -> [ Г а ] ;
define GiComposeRule [ G i ] -> [ Г и ] ;
define GyComposeRule [ G y ] -> [ Г ы ] ;
define GüComposeRule [ G ü ] -> [ Г ю ] ;
define GuComposeRule [ G u ] -> [ Г у ] ;
define GeComposeRule [ G e ] -> [ Г е ] ;
define GěComposeRule [ G ě ] -> [ Г э ] ;
define GöComposeRule [ G ö ] -> [ Г ё ] ;
define GoComposeRule [ G o ] -> [ Г о ] ;

define DäComposeRule [ D ä ] -> [ Д я ] ;
define DaComposeRule [ D a ] -> [ Д а ] ;
define DiComposeRule [ D i ] -> [ Д и ] ;
define DyComposeRule [ D y ] -> [ Д ы ] ;
define DüComposeRule [ D ü ] -> [ Д ю ] ;
define DuComposeRule [ D u ] -> [ Д у ] ;
define DeComposeRule [ D e ] -> [ Д е ] ;
define DěComposeRule [ D ě ] -> [ Д э ] ;
define DöComposeRule [ D ö ] -> [ Д ё ] ;
define DoComposeRule [ D o ] -> [ Д о ] ;
define DʹComposeRule [ D́ ] -> [ Д ь ] ;

define ŽäComposeRule [ Ž ä ] -> [ Ж я ] ;
define ŽaComposeRule [ Ž a ] -> [ Ж а ] ;
define ŽiComposeRule [ Ž i ] -> [ Ж и ] ;
define ŽyComposeRule [ Ž y ] -> [ Ж ы ] ;
define ŽüComposeRule [ Ž ü ] -> [ Ж ю ] ;
define ŽuComposeRule [ Ž u ] -> [ Ж у ] ;
define ŽeComposeRule [ Ž e ] -> [ Ж е ] ;
define ŽěComposeRule [ Ž ě ] -> [ Ж э ] ;
define ŽöComposeRule [ Ž ö ] -> [ Ж ё ] ;
define ŽoComposeRule [ Ž o ] -> [ Ж о ] ;

define ZäComposeRule [ Z ä ] -> [ З я ] ;
define ZaComposeRule [ Z a ] -> [ З а ] ;
define ZiComposeRule [ Z i ] -> [ З и ] ;
define ZyComposeRule [ Z y ] -> [ З ы ] ;
define ZüComposeRule [ Z ü ] -> [ З ю ] ;
define ZuComposeRule [ Z u ] -> [ З у ] ;
define ZeComposeRule [ Z e ] -> [ З е ] ;
define ZěComposeRule [ Z ě ] -> [ З э ] ;
define ZöComposeRule [ Z ö ] -> [ З ё ] ;
define ZoComposeRule [ Z o ] -> [ З о ] ;
define ŹComposeRule [ Ź ] -> [ З ь ] ;

define JäComposeRule [ J ä ] -> [ Й я ] ;
define JaComposeRule [ J a ] -> [ Й а ] ;
define JiComposeRule [ J i ] -> [ Й и ] ;
define JyComposeRule [ J y ] -> [ Й ы ] ;
define JüComposeRule [ J ü ] -> [ Й ю ] ;
define JuComposeRule [ J u ] -> [ Й у ] ;
define JeComposeRule [ J e ] -> [ Й е ] ;
define JěComposeRule [ J ě ] -> [ Й э ] ;
define JöComposeRule [ J ö ] -> [ Й ё ] ;
define JoComposeRule [ J o ] -> [ Й о ] ;

define KäComposeRule [ K ä ] -> [ К я ] ;
define KaComposeRule [ K a ] -> [ К а ] ;
define KiComposeRule [ K i ] -> [ К и ] ;
define KyComposeRule [ K y ] -> [ К ы ] ;
define KüComposeRule [ K ü ] -> [ К ю ] ;
define KuComposeRule [ K u ] -> [ К у ] ;
define KeComposeRule [ K e ] -> [ К е ] ;
define KěComposeRule [ K ě ] -> [ К э ] ;
define KöComposeRule [ K ö ] -> [ К ё ] ;
define KoComposeRule [ K o ] -> [ К о ] ;

define LäComposeRule [ L ä ] -> [ Л я ] ;
define LaComposeRule [ L a ] -> [ Л а ] ;
define LiComposeRule [ L i ] -> [ Л и ] ;
define LyComposeRule [ L y ] -> [ Л ы ] ;
define LüComposeRule [ L ü ] -> [ Л ю ] ;
define LuComposeRule [ L u ] -> [ Л у ] ;
define LeComposeRule [ L e ] -> [ Л е ] ;
define LěComposeRule [ L ě ] -> [ Л э ] ;
define LöComposeRule [ L ö ] -> [ Л ё ] ;
define LoComposeRule [ L o ] -> [ Л о ] ;
define ĹComposeRule [ Ĺ ] -> [ Л ь ] ;

define MäComposeRule [ M ä ] -> [ М я ] ;
define MaComposeRule [ M a ] -> [ М а ] ;
define MiComposeRule [ M i ] -> [ М и ] ;
define MyComposeRule [ M y ] -> [ М ы ] ;
define MüComposeRule [ M ü ] -> [ М ю ] ;
define MuComposeRule [ M u ] -> [ М у ] ;
define MeComposeRule [ M e ] -> [ М е ] ;
define MěComposeRule [ M ě ] -> [ М э ] ;
define MöComposeRule [ M ö ] -> [ М ё ] ;
define MoComposeRule [ M o ] -> [ М о ] ;

define NäComposeRule [ N ä ] -> [ Н я ] ;
define NaComposeRule [ N a ] -> [ Н а ] ;
define NiComposeRule [ N i ] -> [ Н и ] ;
define NyComposeRule [ N y ] -> [ Н ы ] ;
define NüComposeRule [ N ü ] -> [ Н ю ] ;
define NuComposeRule [ N u ] -> [ Н у ] ;
define NeComposeRule [ N e ] -> [ Н е ] ;
define NěComposeRule [ N ě ] -> [ Н э ] ;
define NöComposeRule [ N ö ] -> [ Н ё ] ;
define NoComposeRule [ N o ] -> [ Н о ] ;
define ŃComposeRule [ Ń ] -> [ Н ь ] ;

define PäComposeRule [ P ä ] -> [ П я ] ;
define PaComposeRule [ P a ] -> [ П а ] ;
define PiComposeRule [ P i ] -> [ П и ] ;
define PyComposeRule [ P y ] -> [ П ы ] ;
define PüComposeRule [ P ü ] -> [ П ю ] ;
define PuComposeRule [ P u ] -> [ П у ] ;
define PeComposeRule [ P e ] -> [ П е ] ;
define PěComposeRule [ P ě ] -> [ П э ] ;
define PöComposeRule [ P ö ] -> [ П ё ] ;
define PoComposeRule [ P o ] -> [ П о ] ;

define RäComposeRule [ R ä ] -> [ Р я ] ;
define RaComposeRule [ R a ] -> [ Р а ] ;
define RiComposeRule [ R i ] -> [ Р и ] ;
define RyComposeRule [ R y ] -> [ Р ы ] ;
define RüComposeRule [ R ü ] -> [ Р ю ] ;
define RuComposeRule [ R u ] -> [ Р у ] ;
define ReComposeRule [ R e ] -> [ Р е ] ;
define RěComposeRule [ R ě ] -> [ Р э ] ;
define RöComposeRule [ R ö ] -> [ Р ё ] ;
define RoComposeRule [ R o ] -> [ Р о ] ;
define ŔComposeRule [ Ŕ ] -> [ Р ь ] ;

define SäComposeRule [ S ä ] -> [ С я ] ;
define SaComposeRule [ S a ] -> [ С а ] ;
define SiComposeRule [ S i ] -> [ С и ] ;
define SyComposeRule [ S y ] -> [ С ы ] ;
define SüComposeRule [ S ü ] -> [ С ю ] ;
define SuComposeRule [ S u ] -> [ С у ] ;
define SeComposeRule [ S e ] -> [ С е ] ;
define SěComposeRule [ S ě ] -> [ С э ] ;
define SöComposeRule [ S ö ] -> [ С ё ] ;
define SoComposeRule [ S o ] -> [ С о ] ;
define ŚComposeRule [ Ś ] -> [ С ь ] ;

define TäComposeRule [ T ä ] -> [ Т я ] ;
define TaComposeRule [ T a ] -> [ Т а ] ;
define TiComposeRule [ T i ] -> [ Т и ] ;
define TyComposeRule [ T y ] -> [ Т ы ] ;
define TüComposeRule [ T ü ] -> [ Т ю ] ;
define TuComposeRule [ T u ] -> [ Т у ] ;
define TeComposeRule [ T e ] -> [ Т е ] ;
define TěComposeRule [ T ě ] -> [ Т э ] ;
define TöComposeRule [ T ö ] -> [ Т ё ] ;
define ToComposeRule [ T o ] -> [ Т о ] ;
define TʹComposeRule [ T́ ] -> [ Т ь ] ;

define FäComposeRule [ F ä ] -> [ Ф я ] ;
define FaComposeRule [ F a ] -> [ Ф а ] ;
define FiComposeRule [ F i ] -> [ Ф и ] ;
define FyComposeRule [ F y ] -> [ Ф ы ] ;
define FüComposeRule [ F ü ] -> [ Ф ю ] ;
define FuComposeRule [ F u ] -> [ Ф у ] ;
define FeComposeRule [ F e ] -> [ Ф е ] ;
define FěComposeRule [ F ě ] -> [ Ф э ] ;
define FöComposeRule [ F ö ] -> [ Ф ё ] ;
define FoComposeRule [ F o ] -> [ Ф о ] ;

define XäComposeRule [ X ä ] -> [ Х я ] ;
define XaComposeRule [ X a ] -> [ Х а ] ;
define XiComposeRule [ X i ] -> [ Х и ] ;
define XyComposeRule [ X y ] -> [ Х ы ] ;
define XüComposeRule [ X ü ] -> [ Х ю ] ;
define XuComposeRule [ X u ] -> [ Х у ] ;
define XeComposeRule [ X e ] -> [ Х е ] ;
define XěComposeRule [ X ě ] -> [ Х э ] ;
define XöComposeRule [ X ö ] -> [ Х ё ] ;
define XoComposeRule [ X o ] -> [ Х о ] ;

define CäComposeRule [ C ä ] -> [ Ц я ] ;
define CaComposeRule [ C a ] -> [ Ц а ] ;
define CiComposeRule [ C i ] -> [ Ц и ] ;
define CyComposeRule [ C y ] -> [ Ц ы ] ;
define CüComposeRule [ C ü ] -> [ Ц ю ] ;
define CuComposeRule [ C u ] -> [ Ц у ] ;
define CeComposeRule [ C e ] -> [ Ц е ] ;
define CěComposeRule [ C ě ] -> [ Ц э ] ;
define CöComposeRule [ C ö ] -> [ Ц ё ] ;
define CoComposeRule [ C o ] -> [ Ц о ] ;
define ĆComposeRule [ Ć ] -> [ Ц ь ] ;

define ČäComposeRule [ Č ä ] -> [ Ч я ] ;
define ČaComposeRule [ Č a ] -> [ Ч а ] ;
define ČiComposeRule [ Č i ] -> [ Ч и ] ;
define ČyComposeRule [ Č y ] -> [ Ч ы ] ;
define ČüComposeRule [ Č ü ] -> [ Ч ю ] ;
define ČuComposeRule [ Č u ] -> [ Ч у ] ;
define ČeComposeRule [ Č e ] -> [ Ч е ] ;
define ČěComposeRule [ Č ě ] -> [ Ч э ] ;
define ČöComposeRule [ Č ö ] -> [ Ч ё ] ;
define ČoComposeRule [ Č o ] -> [ Ч о ] ;

define ŠäComposeRule [ Š ä ] -> [ Ш я ] ;
define ŠaComposeRule [ Š a ] -> [ Ш а ] ;
define ŠiComposeRule [ Š i ] -> [ Ш и ] ;
define ŠyComposeRule [ Š y ] -> [ Ш ы ] ;
define ŠüComposeRule [ Š ü ] -> [ Ш ю ] ;
define ŠuComposeRule [ Š u ] -> [ Ш у ] ;
define ŠeComposeRule [ Š e ] -> [ Ш е ] ;
define ŠěComposeRule [ Š ě ] -> [ Ш э ] ;
define ŠöComposeRule [ Š ö ] -> [ Ш ё ] ;
define ŠoComposeRule [ Š o ] -> [ Ш о ] ;

define ŜäComposeRule [ Ŝ ä ] -> [ Щ я ] ;
define ŜaComposeRule [ Ŝ a ] -> [ Щ а ] ;
define ŜiComposeRule [ Ŝ i ] -> [ Щ и ] ;
define ŜyComposeRule [ Ŝ y ] -> [ Щ ы ] ;
define ŜüComposeRule [ Ŝ ü ] -> [ Щ ю ] ;
define ŜuComposeRule [ Ŝ u ] -> [ Щ у ] ;
define ŜeComposeRule [ Ŝ e ] -> [ Щ е ] ;
define ŜěComposeRule [ Ŝ ě ] -> [ Щ э ] ;
define ŜöComposeRule [ Ŝ ö ] -> [ Щ ё ] ;
define ŜoComposeRule [ Ŝ o ] -> [ Щ о ] ;

! Word-initial

define JaComposeRule [ .#. J a ] -> [ .#. Я ] ;
define JoComposeRule [ .#. J o ] -> [ .#. Ё ] ;
define JuComposeRule [ .#. J u ] -> [ .#. Ю ] ;

! After vowel

define ÄjaComposeRule [ Ä J A ] -> [ Я я ] ;
define AjaComposeRule [ A J A ] -> [ А я ] ;
define ÖjaComposeRule [ Ö J A ] -> [ Ё я ] ;
define OjaComposeRule [ O j a ] -> [ О я ] ;
define ÜjaComposeRule [ Ü j a ] -> [ Ю я ] ;
define UjaComposeRule [ U j a ] -> [ У я ] ;
define EjaComposeRule [ E j a ] -> [ Е я ] ;
define ĚjaComposeRule [ Ě j a ] -> [ Э я ] ;
define IjaComposeRule [ I j a ] -> [ И я ] ;
define YjaComposeRule [ Y j a ] -> [ Ы я ] ;

define ÄjoComposeRule [ Ä j o ] -> [ Я ё ] ;
define AjoComposeRule [ A j o ] -> [ А ё ] ;
define ÖjoComposeRule [ Ö j o ] -> [ Ё ё ] ;
define OjoComposeRule [ O j o ] -> [ О ё ] ;
define ÜjoComposeRule [ Ü j o ] -> [ Ю ё ] ;
define UjoComposeRule [ U j o ] -> [ У ё ] ;
define EjoComposeRule [ E j o ] -> [ Е ё ] ;
define ĚjoComposeRule [ Ě j o ] -> [ Э ё ] ;
define IjoComposeRule [ I j o ] -> [ И ё ] ;
define YjoComposeRule [ Y j o ] -> [ Ы ё ] ;

define ÄjuComposeRule [ Ä j u ] -> [ Я ю ] ;
define AjuComposeRule [ A j u ] -> [ А ю ] ;
define ÖjuComposeRule [ Ö j u ] -> [ Ё ю ] ;
define OjuComposeRule [ O j u ] -> [ О ю ] ;
define ÜjuComposeRule [ Ü j u ] -> [ Ю ю ] ;
define UjuComposeRule [ U j u ] -> [ У ю ] ;
define EjuComposeRule [ E j u ] -> [ Е ю ] ;
define ĚjuComposeRule [ Ě j u ] -> [ Э ю ] ;
define IjuComposeRule [ I j u ] -> [ И ю ] ;
define YjuComposeRule [ Y j u ] -> [ Ы ю ] ;

! single letters

define ARule [ A ] -> [ А ] ;
define BRule [ B ] -> [ Б ] ;
define VRule [ V ] -> [ В ] ;
define GRule [ G ] -> [ Г ] ;
define DRule [ D ] -> [ Д ] ;
define ERule [ E ] -> [ Е ] ;
define ÖRule [ Ö ] -> [ Ё ] ;
define ŽRule [ Ž ] -> [ Ж ] ;
define ZRule [ Z ] -> [ З ] ;
define IRule [ I ] -> [ И ] ;
define JRule [ J ] -> [ Й ] ;
define KRule [ K ] -> [ К ] ;
define LRule [ L ] -> [ Л ] ;
define MRule [ M ] -> [ М ] ;
define NRule [ N ] -> [ Н ] ;
define ORule [ O ] -> [ О ] ;
define PRule [ P ] -> [ П ] ;
define RRule [ R ] -> [ Р ] ;
define SRule [ S ] -> [ С ] ;
define TRule [ T ] -> [ Т ] ;
define URule [ U ] -> [ У ] ;
define FRule [ F ] -> [ Ф ] ;
define XRule [ X ] -> [ Х ] ;
define CRule [ C ] -> [ Ц ] ;
define ČRule [ Č ] -> [ Ч ] ;
define ŠRule [ Š ] -> [ Ш ] ;
define ŜRule [ Ŝ ] -> [ Щ ] ;
define YRule [ Y ] -> [ Ы ] ;
define ĚRule [ Ě ] -> [ Э ] ;
define ÜRule [ Ü ] -> [ Ю ] ;
define ÄRule [ Ä ] -> [ Я ] ;

! lower-case letters
